Washington statutes.
RCW 4.48.100

Compensation of referee—Trial expense—Obligation of parties, when.

(1) The compensation of a referee appointed under RCW 4.48.020 shall be the same as that established for a superior court judge pro tempore under RCW 2.08.180.

(2) If a referee is appointed pursuant to RCW 4.48.010, the referee's compensation shall be at the rate prescribed by subsection (1) of this section, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.

(3) Payment of the compensation of a referee appointed under RCW 4.48.010 and the expense of the trial before the referee shall be the obligation of the parties. The obligation shall be borne equally unless the parties agree to a different allocation.

[ 1984 c 258 s 524; Code 1881 s 514; 1877 p 109 s 518; 1854 p 202 s 376; RRS s 483.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Supplemental proceedings, fees of referees: RCW 6.32.280.